California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
The Director of Health Care Services, in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, may develop the appropriate educational materials and a training curriculum, and may provide training as necessary to ensure that those persons providing services pursuant to this part fully understand its purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 31.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.25.

“Gravely disabled minor” means a minor who, as a result of a mental disorder, is unable to use the elements of life that are essential to health, safety, and development, including food, clothing, and shelter, even though provided to the minor by others. Intellectual disability, epilepsy, or other developmental disabilities, alcoholism, other drug abuse, or repeated antisocial behavior do not, by themselves, constitute a mental disorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 53.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Civil Commitment of Minors [5585.50. - 5585.59.]

5585.50.

(a) When any minor, as a result of mental disorder, is a danger to others, or to himself or herself, or gravely disabled and authorization for voluntary treatment is not available, a peace officer, member of the attending staff, as defined by regulation, of an evaluation facility designated by the county, or other professional person designated by the county may, upon probable cause, take, or cause to be taken, the minor into custody and place him or her in a facility designated by the county and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services as a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation of minors. The facility shall make every effort to notify the minor’s parent or legal guardian as soon as possible after the minor is detained.

(b) The facility shall require an application in writing stating the circumstances under which the minor’s condition was called to the attention of the officer, member of the attending staff, or professional person, and stating that the officer, member of the attending staff, or professional person has probable cause to believe that the minor is, as a result of mental disorder, a danger to others, or to himself or herself, or gravely disabled and authorization for voluntary treatment is not available. If the probable cause is based on the statement of a person other than the officer, member of the attending staff, or professional person, the person shall be liable in a civil action for intentionally giving a statement which he or she knows to be false.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 41.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.52.

Any minor detained under the provisions of Section 5585.50 shall receive a clinical evaluation consisting of multidisciplinary professional analyses of the minor’s medical, psychological, developmental, educational, social, financial, and legal conditions as may appear to constitute a problem. This evaluation shall include a psychosocial evaluation of the family or living environment, or both. Persons providing evaluation services shall be properly qualified professionals with training or supervised experience, or both, in the diagnosis and treatment of minors. Every effort shall be made to involve the minor’s parent or legal guardian in the clinical evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1202, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.53.

If, in the opinion of the professional person conducting the evaluation as specified in Section 5585.52, the minor will require additional mental health treatment, a treatment plan shall be written and shall identify the least restrictive placement alternative in which the minor can receive the necessary treatment. The family, legal guardian, or caretaker and the minor shall be consulted and informed as to the basic recommendations for further treatment and placement requirements. Every effort shall be made to obtain the consent of the minor’s parent or legal guardian prior to treatment and placement of the minor. Inability to obtain the consent of the minor’s parent or legal guardian shall not preclude the involuntary treatment of a minor who is determined to be gravely disabled or a danger to himself or herself or others. Involuntary treatment shall only be allowed in accordance with the provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1202, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.55.

The minor committed for involuntary treatment under this part shall be placed in a mental health facility designated by the county and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services as a facility for 72-hour evaluation and treatment. Except as provided for in Section 5751.7, each county shall ensure that minors under 16 years of age are not held with adults receiving psychiatric treatment under the provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 42.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.57.

A minor experiencing a mental health condition, upon being considered for release from involuntary treatment, shall have an aftercare plan developed. The plan shall include educational or training needs, provided these are necessary for the minor’s well-being.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 20.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.58.

This part shall be funded under the Bronzan-McCorquodale Act pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600), as part of the county performance contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1245, Sec. 8.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.59.

For the purposes of this part, legally emancipated minors requiring involuntary treatment shall be considered adults and this part shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1202, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. THE BRONZAN-MCCORQUODALE ACT [5600. - 5772.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [5600. - 5623.6.]

5600.

(a) This part shall be known and may be cited as the Bronzan-McCorquodale Act. This part is intended to organize and finance community mental health services for persons with mental health disorders in every county through locally administered and locally controlled community mental health programs. It is furthermore intended to better utilize existing resources at both the state and local levels in order to improve the effectiveness of necessary mental health services; to integrate state-operated and community mental health programs into a unified mental health system; to ensure that all mental health professions be appropriately represented and utilized in the mental health programs; to provide a means for participation by local governments in the determination of the need for and the
 allocation of mental health resources under the jurisdiction of the state; and to provide a means of allocating mental health funds deposited in the Local Revenue Fund equitably among counties according to community needs.

(b) With the exception of those referring to Short-Doyle Medi-Cal services, any other provisions of law referring to the Short-Doyle Act shall be construed as referring to the Bronzan-McCorquodale Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 100.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.1.

The mission of California’s mental health system shall be to enable persons experiencing severe and disabling mental illnesses and children with serious emotional disturbances to access services and programs that assist them, in a manner tailored to each individual, to better control their illness, to achieve their personal goals, and to develop skills and supports leading to their living the most constructive and satisfying lives possible in the least restrictive available settings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 35.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.2.

To the extent resources are available, public mental health services in this state should be provided to priority target populations in systems of care that are client-centered, culturally competent, and fully accountable, and which include the following factors:

(a) Client-Centered Approach. All services and programs designed for persons with mental disabilities should be client centered, in recognition of varying individual goals, diverse needs, concerns, strengths, motivations, and disabilities. Persons with mental disabilities:

(1) Retain all the rights, privileges, opportunities, and responsibilities of other citizens unless specifically limited by federal or state law or regulations.

(2) Are the central and deciding figure, except where specifically limited by law, in all planning for treatment and rehabilitation based on their individual needs. Planning should also include family members and friends as a source of information and support. 

(3) Shall be viewed as total persons and members of families and communities. Mental health services should assist clients in returning to the most constructive and satisfying lifestyles of their own definition and choice.

(4) Should receive treatment and rehabilitation in the most appropriate and least restrictive environment, preferably in their own communities. 

(5) Should have an identifiable person or team responsible for their support and treatment. 

(6) Shall have available a mental health advocate to ensure their rights as mental health consumers pursuant to Section 5521. 

(b) Priority Target Populations. Persons with serious mental illnesses have severe, disabling conditions that require treatment, giving them a high priority for receiving available services.

(c) Systems of Care. The mental health system should develop coordinated, integrated, and effective services organized in systems of care to meet the unique needs of children and youth with serious emotional disturbances, and adults, older adults, and special populations with serious mental illnesses. These systems of care should operate in conjunction with an interagency network of other services necessary for individual clients.

(d) Outreach. Mental health services should be accessible to all consumers on a 24-hour basis in times of crisis. Assertive outreach should make mental health services available to homeless and hard-to-reach individuals with mental disabilities. 

(e) Multiple Disabilities. Mental health services should address the special needs of children and youth, adults, and older adults with dual and multiple disabilities. 

(f) Quality of Service. Qualified individuals trained in the client-centered approach should provide effective services based on measurable outcomes and deliver those services in environments conducive to clients’ well-being. 

(g) Cultural Competence. All services and programs at all levels should have the capacity to provide services sensitive to the target populations’ cultural diversity. Systems of care should:

(1) Acknowledge and incorporate the importance of culture, the assessment of cross-cultural relations, vigilance towards dynamics resulting from cultural differences, the expansion of cultural knowledge, and the adaptation of services to meet culturally unique needs.

(2) Recognize that culture implies an integrated pattern of human behavior, including language, thoughts, beliefs, communications, actions, customs, values, and other institutions of racial, ethnic, religious, or social groups. 

(3) Promote congruent behaviors, attitudes, and policies enabling the system, agencies, and mental health professionals to function effectively in cross-cultural institutions and communities. 

(h) Community Support. Systems of care should incorporate the concept of community support for individuals with mental disabilities and reduce the need for more intensive treatment services through measurable client outcomes.

(i) Self-Help. The mental health system should promote the development and use of self-help groups by individuals with serious mental illnesses so that these groups will be available in all areas of the state. 

(j) Outcome Measures. State and local mental health systems of care should be developed based on client-centered goals and evaluated by measurable client outcomes.

(k) Administration. Both state and local departments of mental health should manage programs in an efficient, timely, and cost-effective manner. 

(l) Research. The mental health system should encourage basic research into the nature and causes of mental illnesses and cooperate with research centers in efforts leading to improved treatment methods, service delivery, and quality of life for mental health clients. 

(m) Education on Mental Illness. Consumer and family advocates for mental health should be encouraged and assisted in informing the public about the nature of mental illness from their viewpoint and about the needs of consumers and families. Mental health professional organizations should be encouraged to disseminate the most recent research findings in the treatment and prevention of mental illness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1374, Sec. 15.   Effective October 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.3.

To the extent resources are available, the primary goal of the use of funds deposited in the mental health account of the local health and welfare trust fund should be to serve the target populations identified in the following categories, which shall not be construed as establishing an order of priority:

(a) (1) A child or adolescent with serious emotional disturbance.

(2) For the purposes of this part,
 a “child or adolescent with serious emotional disturbance” means a minor under 18 years of age who has a mental disorder, as identified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, other than a primary substance use disorder or developmental disorder that
 results in behavior inappropriate to the child’s age according to expected developmental norms. Members of this target population shall meet one or more of the following criteria:

(A) As a result of the mental disorder, the child has substantial impairment in at least two of the following areas: self-care, school functioning, family relationships, or ability to function in the community; and either of the following occur:

(i) The child is at risk of removal from home or has already been removed from the home.

(ii) The mental disorder and impairments have been present for more than six months or are likely to continue for more than one year without treatment.

(B) The child displays one of the following: psychotic features, risk of
 suicide, or risk of violence due to a mental disorder.

(C) The child has been assessed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 56320) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code and determined to have emotional disturbance, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 300.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) (1) Adults and older adults who have a serious mental disorder.

(2) For the purposes of this part, “serious mental disorder” means a mental disorder that is severe in degree and persistent in duration, which may cause behavioral functioning which interferes substantially with the primary activities of
 daily living, and which may result in an inability to maintain stable adjustment and independent functioning without treatment, support, and rehabilitation for a long or indefinite period of time. Serious mental disorders include, but are not limited to, schizophrenia, bipolar disorder, post-traumatic stress disorder, as well as major affective disorders or other severely disabling mental disorders. This section does not exclude persons with a serious mental disorder and a diagnosis of a substance use disorder,
 developmental disability, or other physical or mental disorder.

(3) Members of this target population shall meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The person has a mental disorder as identified in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, other than a substance use disorder, developmental disorder, or acquired traumatic brain injury pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4354 unless that person also has a serious mental
 disorder as defined in paragraph (2).

(B) (i) As a result of the mental disorder, the person has substantial functional impairments or symptoms, or a psychiatric history demonstrating that without treatment there is an imminent risk of decompensation to having substantial impairments or symptoms.

(ii) For the purposes of this part, “functional impairment” means being substantially impaired as the result of a mental disorder in independent living, social relationships, vocational skills, or physical condition.

(C) As a result of a mental functional impairment and circumstances, the person is likely to become so disabled as to require public assistance, services, or entitlements.

(4) For the purpose of organizing outreach and
 treatment options, to the extent resources are available, this target population includes, but is not limited to, persons who are any of the following:

(A) Homeless persons who
 have a mental illness.

(B) Persons evaluated by appropriately licensed persons as requiring care in acute treatment facilities, including state hospitals, acute inpatient facilities, institutes for mental disease, and crisis residential programs.

(C) Persons arrested or convicted of crimes.

(D) Persons who require acute treatment as a result of a first episode of mental illness with psychotic features.

(5) California veterans in need of mental health services and who meet the existing eligibility requirements of
 this section, shall be provided services to the extent services are available to other adults pursuant to this section. Veterans who may be eligible for mental health services through the United States Department of Veterans Affairs should be advised of these services by the county and assisted in linking to those services, but the eligible veteran shall not be denied county mental or behavioral health services while waiting for a determination of eligibility for, and availability of, mental or behavioral health services provided by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(A) An eligible veteran shall not be denied county mental health services based solely on their status as a veteran, including whether or not the person is eligible
 for services provided by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(B) Counties shall refer a veteran to the county veterans service officer, if any, to determine the veteran’s eligibility for, and the availability of, mental health services provided by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other federal health care provider.

(C) Counties should consider contracting with community-based veterans’ services agencies, where possible, to provide high-quality, veteran-specific mental health services.

(c) Adults or older adults who require or are at risk of requiring acute psychiatric inpatient
 care, residential treatment, or outpatient crisis intervention because of a mental disorder with symptoms of psychosis, suicidality, or violence.

(d) Persons who need brief treatment as a result of a natural disaster or severe local emergency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 21.5.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.35.

(a) Services should be encouraged in every geographic area to the extent resources are available for clients in the target population categories described in Section 5600.3. 

(b) Services to the target populations should be planned and delivered so as to ensure statewide access by members of the target populations, including all ethnic groups in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 69.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.4.

Community mental health services should be organized to provide an array of treatment options in the following areas, to the extent resources are available:

(a) Precrisis and Crisis Services. Immediate response to individuals in precrisis and crisis and to members of the individual’s support system, on a 24-hour, seven-day-a-week basis. Crisis services may be provided offsite through mobile services. The focus of precrisis services is to offer ideas and strategies to improve the person’s situation, and help access what is needed to avoid crisis. The focus of crisis services is stabilization and crisis resolution, assessment of precipitating and attending factors, and recommendations for meeting identified needs.

(b) Comprehensive Evaluation and Assessment. Includes, but is not limited to, evaluation and assessment of physical and mental health, income support, housing, vocational training and employment, and social support services needs. Evaluation and assessment may be provided offsite through mobile services.

(c) Individual Service Plan. Identification of the short- and long-term service needs of the individual, advocating for, and coordinating the provision of these services. The development of the plan should include the participation of the client, family members, friends, and providers of services to the client, as appropriate.

(d) Medication Education and Management. Includes, but is not limited to, evaluation of the need for administration of, and education about, the risks and benefits associated with medication.
 Clients should be provided this information prior to the administration of medications pursuant to state law. To the extent practicable, families and caregivers should also be informed about medications.

(e) Case Management. Client-specific services that assist clients in gaining access to needed medical, social, educational, and other services. Case management may be provided offsite through mobile services.

(f) Twenty-four Hour Treatment Services. Treatment provided in any of the following: an acute psychiatric hospital, an acute psychiatric unit of a general hospital, a psychiatric health facility, a psychiatric residential treatment facility, an institute for mental disease, a community treatment facility, or community residential treatment programs, including crisis, transitional and long-term programs.

(g) Rehabilitation and Support Services. Treatment and rehabilitation services designed to stabilize symptoms, and to develop, improve, and maintain the skills and supports necessary to live in the community. These services may be provided through various modes of services, including, but not limited to, individual and group counseling, day treatment programs, collateral contacts with friends and family, and peer counseling programs. These services may be provided offsite through mobile services.

(h) Vocational Rehabilitation. Services which provide a range of vocational services to assist individuals to prepare for, obtain, and maintain employment.

(i) Residential Services. Room and board and 24-hour care and supervision.

(j) Services for Homeless Persons. Services designed to assist mentally ill
 persons who are homeless, or at risk of being homeless, to secure housing and financial resources.

(k) Group Services. Services to two or more clients at the same time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 589, Sec. 14.   (AB 2317)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.5.

The minimum array of services for children and youth meeting the target population criteria established in subdivision (a) of Section 5600.3 should include the following modes of service in every geographical area, to the extent resources are available:

(a) Precrisis and crisis services.

(b) Assessment. 

(c) Medication education and management. 

(d) Case management. 

(e) Twenty-four-hour treatment services. 

(f) Rehabilitation and support services designed to alleviate symptoms and foster development of age appropriate cognitive, emotional, and behavioral skills necessary for maturation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1374, Sec. 18.   Effective October 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.6.

The minimum array of services for adults meeting the target population criteria established in subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3 should include the following modes of service in every geographical area, to the extent resources are available:

(a) Precrisis and crisis services. 

(b) Assessment. 

(c) Medication education and management. 

(d) Case management. 

(e) Twenty-four-hour treatment services. 

(f) Rehabilitation and support services. 

(g) Vocational services. 

(h) Residential services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 75.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.7.

The minimum array of services for older adults meeting the target population criteria established in subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3 should include the following modes of service in every geographical area, to the extent resources are available:

(a) Precrisis and crisis services, including mobile services. 

(b) Assessment, including mobile services. 

(c) Medication education and management. 

(d) Case management, including mobile services. 

(e) Twenty-four-hour treatment services. 

(f) Residential services. 

(g) Rehabilitation and support services, including mobile services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 41.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5600.9.

(a) Services to the target populations described in Section 5600.3 should be planned and delivered to the extent practicable so that persons in all ethnic groups are served with programs that meet their cultural needs. 

(b) Services in rural areas should be developed in flexible ways, and may be designed to meet the needs of the indigent and uninsured who are in need of public mental health services because other private services are not available. 

(c) To the extent permitted by law, counties should maximize all available funds for the provision of services to the target populations. Counties are expressly encouraged to develop interagency programs and to blend services and funds for individuals with multiple problems, such as those with mental illness and substance abuse, and children, who are served by multiple agencies. State departments are directed to assist counties in the development of mechanisms to blend funds and to seek any necessary waivers which may be appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 42.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5601.

As used in this part:

(a) “Governing body” means the county board of supervisors or boards of supervisors in the case of counties acting jointly; and in the case of a city, the city council or city councils acting jointly.

(b) “Conference” means the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California as established under former Section 5757.

(c) Unless the context requires otherwise, “to the extent resources are available” means to the extent that funds deposited in the mental health account of the local health and welfare fund are available to an entity qualified to use those funds.

(d) “Part 1” refers to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000)).

(e) “Director of Health Care Services” or “director” means the Director of the State Department of Health Care Services.

(f) “Institution” includes a general acute care hospital, a state hospital, a psychiatric hospital, a psychiatric health facility, a skilled nursing facility, including an institution for mental disease as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5900) of Part 5, an intermediate care facility, a community care facility or other residential treatment facility, or a juvenile or criminal justice institution.

(g) “Mental health service” means any service directed toward early intervention in, or alleviation or prevention of, mental disorder,
 including, but not limited to, diagnosis, evaluation, treatment, personal care, day care, respite care, special living arrangements, community skill training, sheltered employment, socialization, case management, transportation, information, referral, consultation, and community services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 32.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5602.

The board of supervisors of every county, or the boards of supervisors of counties acting under the joint powers provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall establish a community mental health service to cover the entire area of the county or counties. Services of the State Department of Health Care Services shall be provided to the county, or counties acting jointly, or, if both parties agree, the state facilities may, in whole or in part, be leased, rented or sold to the county or counties for county operation, subject to terms and
 conditions approved by the Director of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 117.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.

(a) (1) (A) Each community mental health service shall have a behavioral health board consisting of 10 to 15 members, depending on the preference of the county, appointed by the governing body, except that a board in a county with a population of fewer than 80,000 may have a minimum of 5 members.

(B) A county with more than five supervisors shall have at least the same number of members as the size of its board of supervisors.

(C) This section does not limit the ability of the governing body to increase the number of members above 15.

(2) (A) (i) The board shall serve in an advisory role to the governing body, and one member of the board shall be a member of the local governing body.

(ii) Local behavioral health boards may recommend appointees to the county supervisors.

(iii) The board membership shall reflect the diversity of the client population in the county to the extent possible.

(B) (i) Fifty percent of the board membership shall be consumers, or the parents, spouses, siblings, or adult children of consumers, who are receiving or have received behavioral health services. At least one of these members shall be an individual who is 25 years of age or younger.

(ii) At least 20 percent of the total membership shall be consumers, and at least 20 percent shall be families of consumers.

(C) (i) In a county with a population of 100,000 or more, at least one member of the board shall be a veteran or veteran advocate. In a county with a population of fewer than 100,000, the county shall give a strong preference to appointing at least one member of the board who is a veteran or a veteran advocate.

(ii) To comply with clause (i), a county shall notify its county veterans service officer about vacancies on the board, if the county has a veterans service officer.

(D) (i) At least one member of the board shall be an employee of a local education agency.

(ii) To comply with clause (i), a county shall notify its county office of education about vacancies on the board. 

(E) (i) In addition to the requirements in subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D), counties are encouraged to appoint individuals who have experience with, and knowledge of, the behavioral health system.

(ii) This would include members of the community who engage with individuals living with mental illness or substance use disorder in the course of daily operations, such as representatives of county offices of education,
 large and small businesses, hospitals, hospital districts, physicians practicing in emergency departments, city police chiefs, county sheriffs, and community and nonprofit service providers.

(3) (A)   In counties with a population that is fewer than 80,000, at least one member shall be a consumer and at least one member shall be a parent, spouse, sibling, or adult child of a consumer who is receiving, or has received, mental health or substance use disorder treatment services.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a board in a county with a population that is fewer than 80,000 that elects to have the board exceed the five-member minimum permitted under paragraph (1) shall be required to comply with paragraph (2).

(b) (1) The behavioral health board shall review and evaluate the local public mental health system, pursuant to Section 5604.2, and review and evaluate the local public substance use disorder treatment system.

(2) The behavioral health board shall advise the governing body on community mental health and substance use disorder services delivered by the local mental health agency or local behavioral health agency, as applicable.

(c) (1) The term of each member of the board shall be for three years.

(2) The governing body shall equitably stagger the appointments so that approximately one-third of the appointments
 expire in each year.

(d) If two or more local agencies jointly establish a community mental health service pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the behavioral health board for the community mental health service shall consist of an additional two members for each additional agency, one of whom shall be a consumer or a parent, spouse, sibling, or adult child of a consumer who has received mental health or substance use disorder treatment services.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a member of the board or the member’s spouse shall not be a full-time or part-time county employee of a county mental health and substance use disorder service, an employee of the State Department
 of Health Care Services, or an employee of, or a paid member of the governing body of, a mental health or substance use disorder contract agency.

(2) (A) A consumer of behavioral health services who has obtained employment with an employer described in paragraph (1) and who holds a position in which the consumer does not have an interest, influence, or authority over a financial or contractual matter concerning the employer may be appointed to the board.

(B) The member shall abstain from voting on a financial or contractual issue concerning the member’s employer that may come before the board.

(f) Members of the board shall abstain from voting on an issue in which the member has a financial
 interest as defined in Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(g) If it is not possible to secure membership as specified in this section from among persons who reside in the county, the governing body may substitute representatives of the public interest in behavioral health who are not full-time or part-time employees of the county behavioral health service, the State Department of Health Care Services, or on the staff of, or a paid member of the governing body of, a behavioral health contract agency.

(h) The behavioral health board may be established as an advisory board or a commission, depending on the preference of the county.

(i) For purposes of this section, “veteran advocate” means either a parent, spouse, or adult child of a veteran, or an individual who is part of a veterans organization, including the Veterans of Foreign Wars or the American Legion. 

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 15.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.1.

(a) Local behavioral health boards are subject to the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, relating to meetings of local agencies.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 16) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 17.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.2.

(a) The local behavioral health board shall do all of the following:

(1) Review and evaluate the community’s public behavioral health needs, services, facilities, and special problems in a facility within the county or jurisdiction where mental health or substance use disorder evaluations or services are being provided, including, but not limited to, schools, emergency departments, and psychiatric facilities.

(2) (A) Review county agreements entered into pursuant to Section 5650.

(B) The local behavioral health board may
 make recommendations to the governing body regarding concerns identified within these agreements.

(3) (A) Advise the governing body and the local behavioral health director as to any aspect of the local behavioral health systems.

(B) Local behavioral health boards may request assistance from the local patients’ rights advocates when reviewing and advising on mental health or substance use disorder evaluations or services provided in public facilities with limited access.

(4) (A) Review and approve the procedures used to ensure citizen and professional involvement at all stages of the planning process.

(B) Involvement shall include individuals with lived experience of mental illness, substance use disorder, or both, and their families, community members, advocacy organizations, and behavioral health professionals. It shall also include other professionals who interact with individuals living with mental illnesses or substance use disorders on a daily basis, such as education, emergency services, employment, health care, housing, public safety, local business owners, social services, older adults, transportation, and veterans.

(5) Submit an annual report to the governing body on the needs and performance of the county’s behavioral health system.

(6) (A) Review and make recommendations on applicants for the appointment of a local director of behavioral health services.

(B) The board shall be included in the selection process prior to the vote of the governing body.

(7) Review and comment on the county’s performance outcome data and communicate its findings to the California Behavioral Health Planning Council.

(8) This part does not limit the ability of the governing body to transfer additional duties or authority to a behavioral health board.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that, as part of its duties pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall assess the impact of the realignment of services from the state to the county on services delivered to clients and on the local community.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.
